Massachusetts, session 194th, H4299.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1: Chapter 278 of the Acts and Resolves of 1917 is hereby repealed.
SECTION 2: The position of Fire Chief in the City of Holyoke shall be exempted from
the provisions of Chapter 31 of the General Laws.
SECTION 3: The provisions of Section 1 and Section 2 herein of this Act shall not
impair the civil service status of the present incumbent Fire Chief of said department holding
such status on the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 4: This Act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1